th: การออกแบบเว็บแคม: การประชุม; สำหรับตั้งโต๊ะ; แล็ปท็อป; ต่อแล้วใช้งานได้เลย; รักษาความปลอดภัย; อื่นๆ
el: Σχεδιασμός webcam: Συνέδριο; Επιτραπέζιο; Φορητός υπολογιστής; Plug-and-play; Ασφάλεια; Άλλο
ru: Конструкция веб-камеры: Конференция; ПК; Ноутбук; Автоматическая настройка; Безопасность; Другой
fi: Verkkokameran muotoilu: Konferenssi; Työpöytä; Kannettava tietokone; Kytke ja toista -liitäntätapa; Turvallisuus; Muu
hu: Webkamera kialakítása: Konferencia; Asztali; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Biztonság; Egyéb
lt-LT: Internetinės vaizdo kameros dizainas: Konferencija; Stalinis; Nešiojamojo kompiuterio; Laidinė; Apsauginė; Kita
de: Design der Webcam: Konferenz; Desktop; Laptop; Plug-and-Play; Sicherheit; Sonstiges
es: Diseño de cámara web: Conferencia; Escritorio; Computadora portátil; Plug-and-play; Seguridad; Otros
sv: Webbkamerautförande: Konferens; Desktop; Bärbar dator; Plug-and-play; Säkerhet; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zasnova spletne kamere: Konferenca; Namizna; Prenosni računalnik; Vključi in uporabi; Varnostna; Drugo
da: Webcamdesign: Konference; Desktop; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Sikkerhed; Andet
vi: Thiết kế webcam: Hội nghị; Để bàn; Máy tính xách tay; Cắm và chạy; An toàn; Khác
en: Webcam design: Conference; Desktop; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Security; Other
ja: ウェブカメラの種類: 会議; デスクトップ; ラップトップ; プラグアンドプレイ; セキュリティ; その他
bg-BG: Дизайн на уеб камера: Конференция; Настолен; Лаптоп; Plug-and-play; Защита; Други
tr: Web kamerası tasarımı: Konferans; Masaüstü; Laptop; Tak ve çalıştır; Güvenlik; Diğer
nl: Ontwerp webcam: Congres; Op bureau; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Beveiliging; Andere
pl: Konstrukcja kamery internetowej: Konferencja; Desktop; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Bezpieczeństwo; Inne
cs: Konstrukce webkamery: Konference; Stolní; Notebook; Plug-and-Play; Bezpečnostní; Jiné
pt-PT: Design de webcam: Conferência; De secretária; Portátil; Plug-and-play; Segurança; Outro
fr: Conception de webcam: Conférence; Bureau; Ordinateur portable; Prête à l’emploi; Sécurité; Autre
zh-TW: 網路攝影機設計: 會議; 桌上型; 筆記型電腦; 即插即用; 安全; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn internetske kamere: Konferencija; Stolna; Prijenosno računalo; Uključi i radi; Zaštitna; Ostalo
nb: Webkameradesign: Konferanse; Skrivebord; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Sikkerhet; Annet
it: Design della webcam: Conferenza; Desktop; Computer portatile; Plug-and-play; Sicurezza; Altro
zh-CN: 网络摄像头设计: 会议; 桌面式; 笔记本电脑; 即插即用; 安全; 其他
pt-BR: Formato da webcam: Conferência; Desktop; Laptop; Plug and play; Segurança; Outro
ko: 웹캠 디자인: 컨퍼런스; 데스크탑; 랩톱; 플러그 앤 플레이; 보안; 기타
ro-RO: Design camere web: Conferință; Desktop; Laptop; Plug-and-play; Securitate; Altele
sk-SK: Dizajn webovej kamery: Konferencia; Osobný počítač; Notebook; Plug-and-play; Bezpečnosť; Iné